Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2147.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-15-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-15 entitled "Primary
Elections" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-15-1. Date of primaries.
A primary election for the nomination of candidates for each political party shall be held
in each voting district in the manner provided in this chapter on the eighth Tuesday preceding
biennial state elections. Provided, however, that if the eighth Tuesday is the day after Labor Day,
then the primary election shall be held on the next day, the Wednesday, and in such occurrence, the
dates for the primary candidate nomination, challenge, objection, hearing, withdrawal, vacancy,
and certification processes established by §§ 17-14-11, 17-14-12, 17-15-38, and 17-19-7, including
any ensuing statutory deadlines tied to those dates, shall be calculated as if the primary election
were still held on the Tuesday.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004179/SUB A
========